Vermont statutes. Title 11 Corporations, Partnerships, and Associations
Subchapter 8. Transition Provisions

§ 880.
Application to existing corporations.

This chapter does not apply to a corporation now existing unless the corporation elects professional corporation status under section 820 of this title.

This chapter does not affect an existing or future right or privilege to render professional services through the use of any other form of business entity.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

See note set out under chapter 4 of this title.

§ 881.
Compliance with ownership provisions.

Notwithstanding the ownership limitations imposed by this chapter, persons who are authorized pursuant to 26 V.S.A chapter to own shares of an organization rendering licensed accounting services may own shares of a professional corporation pursuant to section 830 of this title, and such organizations with nonlicensee owners shall be deemed to comply with sections 840, 860, 861, and 871 of this title by complying with the ownership and governance requirements 26 V.S.A. chapter 1.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.